District of Columbia statutes.
47-2851.17

Performance audit.

The Auditor of the District of Columbia shall conduct a performance audit of the basic business licensing program and report to the Council not later than 5 years after April 29, 1998. At a minimum, this study should include an examination of the program cost and effectiveness.

Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 101(b), 45 DCR 1172
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2002(b), 46 DCR 3142
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-264, § 52(t), 46 DCR 2118
Oct. 28, 2003, D.C. Law 15-38, § 2(q), 50 DCR 6913
1981 Ed., § 47-2851.17.
D.C. Law 15-38 substituted “basic” for “master”.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(q) of Streamlining Regulation Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-145, August 11, 2003, 50 DCR 6896).